Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.418

Joint center for aerospace technology innovation—Repeal.

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2031:

(1) RCW 28B.155.010 and 2014 c 174 s 3, 2014 c 112 s 102, & 2012 c 242 s 1;

(2) RCW 28B.155.020 and 2012 c 242 s 2; and

(3) RCW 28B.155.030 and 2020 c 306 s 3.

[ 2020 c 306 s 2; 2014 c 112 s 122; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 24 s 3; 2012 c 242 s 4.]